Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.028

Transfer programs.

In order to recognize prior education that is applicable to licensure as a massage therapist or massage practitioner while protecting the public, the board shall adopt rules to allow massage programs that are approved by the board to establish transfer programs that accept an individual's credits or clock hours from schools that have not been approved by the board. "Prior education" must be defined to include but not be limited to, credits or clock hours from schools, colleges, and universities that are:

(1) Accredited by a national or regional accreditation organization;

(2) Approved by a state authority with responsibility for oversight of vocational programs; or

(3) Approved by a state agency that regulates massage programs and is a member of the federation of state massage therapy boards.

[ 2016 c 53 s 1.]